Illinois, session 104th, SB3557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Guardianship and Advocacy Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 4, 5, and 26 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3955/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 702)7    Sec. 2. As used in this Act, unless the context requires 8otherwise:9    (a) "Authority" means a Human Rights Authority.10    (b) "Commission" means the Guardianship and Advocacy 11Commission.12    (c) "Director" means the Director of the Guardianship and 13Advocacy Commission.14    (d) "Guardian" means a court appointed guardian or 15conservator.16    (e) "Services" includes but is not limited to examination, 17diagnosis, evaluation, treatment, care, training, 18psychotherapy, pharmaceuticals, after-care, habilitation, and 19rehabilitation provided for an eligible person.20    (f) "Person" means an individual, corporation, 21partnership, association, unincorporated organization, or a 22government or any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality 23thereof.  SB3557- 2 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1    (g) "Eligible persons" means individuals who have 2received, are receiving, have requested, or may be in need of 3mental health services, or are "persons with a "developmental 4disability" as defined in the federal Developmental 5Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (42 6U.S.C. 15002(8)), Services and Facilities Construction Act 7(Public Law 94-103, Title II), as now or as hereafter amended, 8or "persons "with one or more disabilities" as defined in the 9Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act.10    (h) "Rights" includes but is not limited to all rights, 11benefits, and privileges guaranteed by law, the Constitution 12of the State of Illinois, and the Constitution of the United 13States.14    (i) "Legal Advocacy Service attorney" means an attorney 15employed by or under contract with the Legal Advocacy Service.16    (j) "Service provider" means any public or private 17facility, center, hospital, clinic, program, or any other 18person devoted in whole or in part to providing services to 19eligible persons.20    (k) "State Guardian" means the Office of State Guardian.21    (l) "Ward" means a ward as defined by the Probate Act of 221975, as now or hereafter amended, who is at least 18 years of 23age.24(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 25    (20 ILCS 3955/4)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 704)  SB3557- 3 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1    Sec. 4. (a) The Commission shall consist of 11 members, 2one of whom shall be a senior citizen age 60 or over, who shall 3be appointed by the Governor, taking into account the 4requirements of State and federal statutes, with the advice 5and consent of the Senate.6    All appointments shall be filed with the Secretary of 7State by the appointing authority.8    (b) The terms of the original members shall be 3 one year 9terms, 3 two year terms, and 3 three year terms, all terms to 10continue until a successor is appointed and qualified. The 11length of the terms of the original members shall be drawn by 12lot of the first meeting held by the Commission. The members 13first appointed under this amendatory Act of 1984 shall serve 14for a term of 3 years. Thereafter all terms shall be for 3 15years, with each member serving no more than 2 consecutive 16terms. Vacancies in the membership are to be filled in the same 17manner as original appointments. Appointments to fill 18vacancies occurring before the expiration of a term are for 19the remainder of the unexpired term. A member of the 20Commission shall serve for a term ending on June 30 and until 21his successor is appointed and qualified.22    (c) The Commission shall annually elect a Chairman and any 23other officers it deems necessary. The Commission shall meet 24at least once every 3 months with the times and places of 25meetings determined by the Chairman. Additional meetings may 26be called by the Chairman upon written notice 7 days before the   SB3557- 4 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1meeting or by written petition of 5 members to the Chairman. A 2majority of the Six members of the Commission, excluding 3vacancies, constitute a quorum.4    (d) Members of the Commission are not entitled to 5compensation but shall receive reimbursement for actual 6expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.7(Source: P.A. 83-1538.) 8    (20 ILCS 3955/5)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 705)9    Sec. 5. (a) The Commission shall establish throughout the 10State such regions as it considers appropriate to effectuate 11the purposes of the Authority under this Act, taking into 12account the requirements of State and federal statutes; 13population; civic, health and social service boundaries; and 14other pertinent factors.15    (b) The Commission shall act through its divisions as 16provided in this Act.17    (c) The Commission shall establish general policy 18guidelines for the operation of the Legal Advocacy Service, 19Human Rights Authority and State Guardian in furtherance of 20this Act. Any action taken by a regional authority is subject 21to the review and approval of the Commission. The Commission, 22acting on a request from the Director, may disapprove any 23action of a regional authority, in which case the regional 24authority shall cease such action.25    (d) The Commission shall hire a Director and staff to   SB3557- 5 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1carry out the powers and duties of the Commission and its 2divisions pursuant to this Act and the rules and regulations 3promulgated by the Commission. All staff other than the 4Director shall be subject to the Personnel Code.5    (e) The Commission shall review and evaluate the 6operations of the divisions.7    (f) The Commission shall operate subject to the provisions 8of the Illinois Procurement Code.9    (g) The Commission shall prepare its budget.10    (h) The Commission shall prepare an annual report on its 11operations and submit the report to the Governor and the 12General Assembly.13    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 14shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 15by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 16filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 17Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 18under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.19    (i) The Commission shall establish rules and regulations 20for the conduct of the work of its divisions, including rules 21and regulations for the Legal Advocacy Service and the State 22Guardian in evaluating an eligible person's or ward's 23financial resources for the purpose of determining whether the 24eligible person or ward has the ability to pay for legal or 25guardianship services received. The determination of the 26eligible person's financial ability to pay for legal services   SB3557- 6 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1shall be based upon the number of dependents in the eligible 2person's family unit and the income, liquid assets and 3necessary expenses, as prescribed by rule of the Commission 4of: (1) the eligible person; (2) the eligible person's spouse; 5and (3) the parents of minor eligible persons. The 6determination of a ward's ability to pay for guardianship 7services shall be based upon the ward's estate. An eligible 8person or ward found to have sufficient financial resources 9shall be required to pay the Commission in accordance with 10standards established by the Commission. No fees may be 11charged for legal services given unless the eligible person is 12given notice at the start of such services that such fees might 13be charged. No fees may be charged for guardianship services 14given unless the ward is given notice of the request for fees 15filed with the probate court and the court approves the amount 16of fees to be assessed. All fees collected shall be deposited 17with the State Treasurer and placed in the Guardianship and 18Advocacy Fund. The Commission shall establish rules and 19regulations regarding the procedures of appeal for clients 20prior to termination or suspension of legal services. Such 21rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, 22client notification procedures prior to the actual 23termination, the scope of issues subject to appeal, and 24procedures specifying when a final administrative decision is 25made.26    (j) The Commission shall take such actions as it deems   SB3557- 7 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1necessary and appropriate to receive private, federal and 2other public funds to help support the divisions and to 3safeguard the rights of eligible persons. Private funds and 4property may be accepted, held, maintained, administered and 5disposed of by the Commission, as trustee, for such purposes 6for the benefit of the People of the State of Illinois pursuant 7to the terms of the instrument granting the funds or property 8to the Commission.9    (k) The Commission may expend funds under the State's plan 10to protect and advocate the rights of persons with a 11developmental disability established under the federal 12Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act 13of 2000 Services and Facilities Construction Act (Public Law 1494-103, Title II). If the Governor designates the Commission 15to be the organization or agency to provide the services 16called for in the State plan, the Commission shall make these 17protection and advocacy services available to persons with a 18developmental disability by referral or by contracting for 19these services to the extent practicable. If the Commission is 20unable to so make available such protection and advocacy 21services, it shall provide them through persons in its own 22employ.23    (l) The Commission shall, to the extent funds are 24available, monitor issues concerning the rights of eligible 25persons and the care and treatment provided to those persons, 26including but not limited to the incidence of abuse or neglect   SB3557- 8 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1of eligible persons. For purposes of that monitoring the 2Commission shall have access to reports of suspected abuse or 3neglect and information regarding the disposition of such 4reports, subject to the provisions of the Mental Health and 5Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act.6(Source: P.A. 100-1148, eff. 12-10-18.) 7    (20 ILCS 3955/26)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 726)8    Sec. 26. Subject to the provisions of Section 19, a 9regional authority may make public its findings and 10recommendations. It shall include in any such public statement 11any reply made by the State agency, service provider, or other 12person investigated, if requested by the provider. The 13provider or person shall have opportunity to review and object 14to any proposed public findings and recommendations. If the 15provider requests, the objections shall be included with 16public findings and recommendations issued by the regional 17authority in this matter.18(Source: P.A. 80-1416.) 19    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 20Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 1-110, 211-129, and 3-805 and by adding Section 1-128.5 as follows: 22    (405 ILCS 5/1-110)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-110)23    Sec. 1-110. "Guardian" means the court-appointed court   SB3557- 9 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1appointed guardian or conservator of the person.2(Source: P.A. 80-1414.) 3    (405 ILCS 5/1-128.5 new)4    Sec. 1-128.5. Under guardianship. "Under guardianship", in 5reference to a person or recipient, means an individual for 6whom a guardian has been appointed. 7    (405 ILCS 5/1-129)8    Sec. 1-129. Mental illness. "Mental illness" means a 9mental, or emotional disorder that substantially impairs a 10person's thought, perception of reality, emotional process, 11judgment, behavior, or ability to cope with the ordinary 12demands of life, but does not include a developmental 13disability, a neurocognitive disorder dementia or Alzheimer's 14disease absent psychosis, a substance use disorder, or an 15abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise 16antisocial conduct.17(Source: P.A. 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.) 18    (405 ILCS 5/3-805)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-805)19    Sec. 3-805. Every respondent alleged to be subject to 20involuntary admission on an inpatient or outpatient basis 21shall be represented by counsel. If the respondent is indigent 22or an appearance has not been entered on his behalf at the time 23the matter is set for hearing, the court shall appoint counsel   SB3557- 10 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1for him. A hearing shall not proceed when a respondent is not 2represented by counsel unless, after conferring with counsel, 3the respondent requests to represent himself and the court is 4satisfied that the respondent has the capacity to make an 5informed waiver of his right to counsel. Counsel shall be 6allowed time for adequate preparation and shall not be 7prevented from conferring with the respondent at reasonable 8times nor from making an investigation of the matters in issue 9and presenting such relevant evidence as he believes is 10necessary.11    1. If the court determines that the respondent is unable 12to obtain counsel, the court shall appoint as counsel an 13attorney employed by or under contract with the Guardianship 14and Mental Health Advocacy Commission, if available.15    2. If an attorney from the Guardianship and Mental Health 16Advocacy Commission is not available, the court shall appoint 17as counsel the public defender or, only if no public defender 18is available, an attorney licensed to practice law in this 19State.20    3. Upon filing with the court of a verified statement of 21legal services rendered by the private attorney appointed 22pursuant to paragraph (2) of this Section, the court shall 23determine a reasonable fee for such services. If the 24respondent is unable to pay the fee, the court shall enter an 25order upon the county to pay the entire fee or such amount as 26the respondent is unable to pay.  SB3557- 11 -LRB104 18242 KTG 31681 b1(Source: P.A. 96-1399, eff. 7-29-10; 96-1453, eff. 8-20-10.)